Massachusetts, session 194th, H1294.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 9 of chapter 167B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out subsection (a) and inserting in place thereof the following
subsection:-
(a) For each electronic fund transfer initiated by a consumer from an electronic branch or
point-of-sale terminal, the financial institution holding such consumer's account shall, directly or
indirectly at the time the transfer is initiated, make available to the consumer written
documentation of such transfer. The documentation shall clearly set forth to the extent
applicable:
(1) the amount involved and the calendar date the transfer is initiated;
of 2

(2) the type of transfer and the type of the consumer's account or accounts with the
financial institution from which or to which funds are transferred;
(3) a number or code that uniquely identifies the consumer initiating the transfer, the
consumer's account or accounts, or the access device used to initiate the transfer;
(4) the identity of any third party to whom or from whom funds are transferred;
(5) the location or identification of the electronic branch or point-of-sale terminal
involved;
(6) a transfer identification number which provides a permanent audit trail; and
(7) a list of contact information for the consumer, if the consumer may be experiencing
financial abuse, which shall include, but not limited to:
(i) the financial institution holding the consumer’s account;
(ii) a non-profit that provides advice and support involving financial management;
(iii) the national domestic violence hotline;
(iv) the Massachusetts behavioral health help line;
(v) the Attorney General’s office; and
(vi) 911 if the consumer is in immediate danger.
The information required to be disclosed under clauses (4), (5) and (7) of this subsection
shall be provided in readily understandable language or capable of being explained in readily
understandable language.
of 2